Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-166] Insurance. A corporation
may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a
director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or who, while a
director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at
the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee,
employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic business or nonprofit
corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other
enterprise, against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual in
that capacity or arising from the individual's status as a director, officer,
employee, or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to
indemnify the person against the same liability under section 414D‑160 or
414D‑161. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next